Missouri, session 2026, HB2775.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto three new sections, to
be known as sections 376.464, 376.2099, and 376.2120, to read as follows:
376.464. 1. As used in this section, terms shall have the same meanings given to
them in section 376.1350, except that the term "health carrier" shall also include any
MO HealthNet managed care organization and any health services corporation or
health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 354.
2. No health carrier shall impose any penalty or fee on an in-network health care
provider based on the provision of a health care service by an out-of-network health
care provider.
376.2099. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Anesthesia practitioner", an anesthesiologist or an anesthesiologist
assistant, as such terms are defined in section 334.400;
(2) "Anesthesia time", the period during which an anesthesia practitioner is
present with the patient, beginning when the anesthesia practitioner begins to prepare
the patient for anesthesia in an operating room or equivalent area and ending when the
anesthesia practitioner is no longer delivering anesthesia services to the patient and the
patient may be placed safely under postoperative or postanesthesia care. In calculating
anesthesia time, an anesthesia practitioner may include blocks of time around
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2775 2
interruptions, provided that the anesthesia practitioner is delivering continuous
anesthesia care in the time periods before and after each interruption;
(3) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350.
The term "health carrier" shall also include any MO HealthNet managed care
organization and any health services corporation or health maintenance organization as
defined in chapter 354.
2. Reimbursement amounts from a health carrier for anesthesia services shall be
calculated under the prevailing medical coding and billing standards in the professional
medical billing community. Reimbursement amounts for anesthesia services shall be
calculated based on a base, plus time units, multiplied by an anesthesia conversion
factor as defined in the individual contract between the health carrier and anesthesia
practitioner or group of anesthesia practitioners. Anesthesia time shall be recognized
with time units no more than fifteen minutes in duration. The sum of the anesthesia
time units shall equal the anesthesia time.
3. No health carrier shall directly or indirectly impose a maximum duration of
anesthesia time for which reimbursement will be made for anesthesia provided during a
health care service for which anesthesia is covered.
4. No health carrier shall directly or indirectly restrict or exclude all anesthesia
time from reimbursement for a health care service for which anesthesia is covered.
376.2120. 1. As used in this section, terms shall have the same meanings given to
them in section 376.1350, except that the term "health carrier" shall also include any
MO HealthNet managed care organization and any health services corporation or
health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 354.
2. No contract issued, amended, continued, or renewed on or after August 28,
2026, between a health carrier and an enrollee, or between a health carrier and a health
care provider for the provision of health care services to enrollees, shall authorize the
health carrier to modify or add to the contract, including any manual, policy, protocol,
procedure, program, or other document referred to in the contract, except that the
contract, manual, policy, protocol, procedure, program, or other document may be
modified or added to the contract if:
(1) The modification or addition is:
(a) Subsequently negotiated and agreed to in writing by the parties to the
contract;
(b) Required by or necessary to comply with applicable state or federal law,
regulation, or order;

HB 2775 3
(c) Made to reflect changes to the uniform format and standard medical code
sets promulgated by the department of commerce and insurance in accordance with
subsection 7 of section 376.384; or
(d) Made to reflect changes to the Medicare or MO HealthNet fee schedule; and
(2) The modification or addition is made readily available to each party in an
electronic format at or before the time the amendment takes effect and for the duration
for which claims may be submitted for reimbursement under the contract.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of this section, for contracts
issued, amended, continued, or renewed on or after August 28, 2026, between a health
carrier and an enrollee, or between a health carrier and a health care provider for the
provision of health care services to enrollees, no manual, policy, protocol, procedure,
program, or other document shall be binding upon the provider or enrollee unless it is
referred to in the contract, is in effect at the time the contract is signed, and is made
readily available to each party in an electronic format at or before the time the contract
is signed and for the duration for which claims may be submitted for reimbursement
under the contract.
4. Requirements under this section that a contract or document be made readily
available to each party in an electronic format shall be satisfied by the health carrier
providing each party with electronic access to a copy of the contract or document
without amendments and, for purposes of modifications and additions, with electronic
access to a copy of the contract or document with any amendments indicated by
underlining and bolding any added language and by visually striking through any
deleted language.
5. Any contractual provision waiving or violating the provisions of this section
shall be null and void as against the public policy of this state.
✔